Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-1,103.03
Lifetime community supervision; department; annual review.

(1) The department shall review the conditions of community supervision imposed on an individual pursuant to section 83-174.03 on an annual basis and shall provide the individual the opportunity to submit written materials to the department for consideration during such review.

(2) If the department determines, after reviewing the individual's conduct while under supervision and any other relevant facts, that one or more of the conditions of community supervision imposed upon the individual is no longer necessary to reduce the risk of the individual reoffending or is no longer the least restrictive condition compatible with public safety, the department shall revise the conditions of community supervision so that the individual's freedom is not unnecessarily restricted.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 97;

Laws 2018, LB841, § 32;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 145.